Oklahoma, session 2026, SB352.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 27 O.S. 2021, Section 7, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 7. A. Except as otherwise provided in this section,
any person, firm, or corporation organized under the laws of this
state, or authorized to do business in this state, to furnish light,
heat, or power by electricity or natural gas, or any other person,
association, or firm engaged in furnishing lights, heat, or power by
electricity or natural gas shall have and exercise the right of

ENGR. S. B. NO. 352 Page 1

emin ent domain in the same manner and by like proceedings as
provided for railroad corporations by laws of this state.
B. The power of eminent domain shall not be used for the siting
or building of wind turbines energy facilities, solar energy
facilities, battery storage facilities, or hydrogen gas facilities
on private property.
C. Prior to seeking to exercise the right of eminent domain for
an electric transmission facility rated greater than three hundred
(300) kilovolts, any person, firm, or corporation subject to the
requirements of subsection A of this section shall have obtained a
certificate of authority from the Corporation Commission.
SECTION 2. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.









ENGR. S. B. NO. 352 Page 2

Passed the Senate the 11th day of March, 2025.


Presiding Officer of the Senate

Passed the House of Representatives the ____ day of __________,
2025.


Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives















ENGR. S. B. NO. 352 Page 3